Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5035YH (2) 91 ms/jh H.F. 2061 Section 1. Section 331.604, subsection 3, paragraph g, 1 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (1) Upon request by a peace officer, as defined in section 3 801.4 , civilian employee of a law enforcement agency, or state 4 or federal judicial officer or state or federal prosecutor, 5 United States senator, representative to Congress, statewide 6 elected official, or member of the general assembly, the county 7 assessor or the county assessorâs staff, or the county recorder 8 or the county recorderâs staff, shall redact the requestorâs 9 name contained in electronic documents that are displayed for 10 public access through an internet site. 11 Sec. 2. Section 331.604, subsection 3, paragraph g, 12 subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended by striking the 13 subparagraph. 14 Sec. 3. SECRETARY OF STATE RECOMMENDATIONS. By November 1, 15 2026, the secretary of state shall submit recommendations to 16 the general assembly on how to protect information containing 17 the personal residence of those seeking election while at the 18 same time verifying the candidateâs place of residence for the 19 purpose of meeting any applicable residency requirement. 20